apertium-nn-nb.nn.dix
<pardef n="bøy/ast__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ast</l>       <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>as</l>        <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gst</l>       <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>gs</l>        <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>est</l>       <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>es</l>        <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gdest</l>     <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>gdes</l>      <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="dim/mast__vblex">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>test</l>  <r>mast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/><s n="pstv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mast</l>  <r>mast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>mas</l>   <r>mast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>st</l>    <r>mast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>s</l>	    <r>mast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mest</l>  <r>mast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>mes</l>   <r>mast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dest</l>  <r>mast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>des</l>   <r>mast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>tes</l>   <r>mast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="dr/agast__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>agast</l>     <r>agast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>agas</l>      <r>agast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>egest</l>     <r>agast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>egist</l>     <r>agast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eges</l>      <r>agast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>egis</l>      <r>agast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>egst</l>      <r>agast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>egest</l>     <r>agast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>egs</l>       <r>agast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogst</l>      <r>agast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ogs</l>       <r>agast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ein/ast__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ast</l>       <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>as</l>        <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ast</l>       <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>st</l>        <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>as</l>        <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>s</l>         <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>est</l>       <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ast</l>       <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>as</l>        <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>es</l>        <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>test</l>      <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ast</l>       <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>as</l>        <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>tes</l>       <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="eld/ast__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ast</l>       <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>as</l>        <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>st</l>        <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>s</l>         <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>est</l>       <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>es</l>        <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>test</l>       <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>est</l>      <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>es</l>        <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>tes</l>       <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="fork/omast__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>omast</l>     <r>omast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>omas</l>      <r>omast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ommast</l>    <r>omast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ommas</l>     <r>omast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>omest</l>     <r>omast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>omist</l>     <r>omast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>omes</l>      <r>omast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ommest</l>    <r>omast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ommist</l>    <r>omast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ommis</l>     <r>omast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jemst</l>     <r>omast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>jems</l>      <r>omast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>omst</l>      <r>omast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>oms</l>       <r>omast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="g/jevast__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>jevast</l>    <r>jevast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>jevas</l>    <r>jevast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jevst</l>     <r>jevast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>avst</l>      <r>jevast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="gj/erast__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>erast</l>     <r>erast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eras</l>      <r>erast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ørast</l>     <r>erast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>øras</l>      <r>erast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>orst</l>      <r>erast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ors</l>       <r>erast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erst</l>      <r>erast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ers</l>       <r>erast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ørst</l>      <r>erast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ørs</l>       <r>erast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ordest</l>    <r>erast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ordes</l>     <r>erast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ors</l>       <r>erast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="bendast">	 <i>bend</i><par n="eld/ast__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bøyast">		 <i>bøy</i><par n="bøy/ast__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dimmast">	 <i>dim</i><par n="dim/mast__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dragast">	 <i>dr</i><par n="dr/agast__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="einast">		 <i>ein</i><par n="ein/ast__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="eldast">		 <i>eld</i><par n="eld/ast__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="forkomast">	 <i>fork</i><par n="fork/omast__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="gjerast">         <i>gj</i><par n="gj/erast__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="gjevast">	 <i>g</i><par n="g/jevast__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="skjemmast">	 <i>skjem</i><par n="dim/mast__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ugjerast">	 <i>ugj</i><par n="gj/erast__vblex"/></e>
